Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.580

Dismissal of municipal employees during World War II—Redress authorized.

A municipality may by ordinance or resolution provide for redress to any municipal employee or the surviving spouse of a municipal employee who, due to the promulgation of federal Executive Order 9066, was dismissed, terminated from a temporary position, or rejected during the person's probationary period, or who voluntarily resigned in lieu of dismissal from municipal employment, and who incurred salary and other employment related losses as a result thereof during the years 1942 through 1947.

[ 1986 c 225 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—1986 c 225: "The dismissal or termination of various municipal employees during World War II resulted from the promulgation of federal Executive Order 9066 which was based mainly on fear and suspicion rather than on factual justification. It is fair and just that redress be made to those employees who were terminated from municipal employment during the wartime years because of these circumstances. The legislature therefore finds that equity and fairness will be served by authorizing municipalities to accept claims for salary and other employment related losses suffered by the municipal employees directly affected and to pay the claims subject to the provisions of this chapter." [ 1986 c 225 s 1.]

Severability—1986 c 225: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 225 s 7.]

Reparations to state employees terminated during World War II: Chapter 41.68 RCW.